New Jersey, session 221, S397.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of the New Jersey Code of Criminal Justice, Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes, to the contrary, all of the following crimes, disorderly persons offenses, and petty disorderly persons offenses as set forth throughout various chapters of that Title, committed during the Public Health Emergency and State of Emergency declared by the Governor in Executive Order 103 of 2020 concerning the coronavirus disease 2019 pandemic, shall be upgraded as set forth in subsection b. of this section.  These crimes, disorderly persons offenses, and petty disorderly persons offenses are set forth in: (1)   chapter 11, Criminal Homicide; (2)   chapter 12, Assault; Reckless Endangering; Threats; (3)   chapter 13, Kidnapping and Related Offenses: Coercion; (4)   chapter 14, Sexual Offenses; and (5)   chapter 15, Robbery. b.   During the declared emergency: (1)   Any petty disorderly persons offense set forth in the chapters described in subsection a. of this section constitutes a disorderly persons offense; (2)   Any disorderly persons offense set forth in the chapters described in subsection a. of this section constitutes a crime of the fourth degree; and (3)   Any crime set forth in the chapters described in subsection a. of this section shall be classified one degree higher, provided that with respect to a crime of the first degree, that crime remains a crime of the first degree, but a person convicted for that degree of crime shall be sentenced to a term of imprisonment that shall include a mandatory minimum term of one-third to one-half of the sentence imposed, during which time the person shall not be eligible for parole, unless a greater mandatory minimum with parole ineligibility for that particular crime is set forth in the New Jersey Code of Criminal Justice, Title 2C of the New Jersey Statutes, in which case the greater sentence shall apply. c.    This section shall expire upon the declared end to the Public Health Emergency and State of Emergency first declared by the Governor in Executive Order 103 of 2020, except to the extent necessary for its application in prosecuting and sentencing persons who are guilty of any crimes, disorderly persons offenses, and petty disorderly persons offenses as set forth in subsection a. of this section. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.